Nebraska, session 109, LB899.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB899 LB899
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-3437.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-3437.01 (1) Each licensee authorized to practice architecture or
engineering must obtain a seal. The design of the seal shall be
determined by the board. If a professional engineer's license has been
issued in a specific discipline, the discipline shall be specified on the
seal. The following information shall be on the seal: State of Nebraska;
licensee's name; licensee's license number; and the words Architect or
Professional (discipline) Engineer.
(2) Whenever the seal is applied, the licensee's signature and the
date of the seal's application shall be placed across or adjacent to the
seal in a manner that does not obscure the licensee's name or the license
number on the seal. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for application of the seal.
(3) The seal and the date of its placement shall be on all technical
submissions and calculations whenever presented to a client or any public
or governmental agency. It shall be unlawful for a licensee to affix his
or her seal or to permit his or her seal to be affixed to any document
after the expiration of the certificate or for the purpose of aiding or
abetting any other person to evade or attempt to evade the Engineers and
Architects Regulation Act.
(4) The seal and date shall be placed on all originals, copies,
tracings, or other reproducible drawings and the first page and last
pages of specifications, reports, and studies in such a manner that the
seal, signature, and date will be reproduced and be in compliance with
rules and regulations of the board. The application of the licensee's
seal shall constitute certification that the work was done by the
licensee or under the licensee's control.
(5) In the case of a temporary permit issued to a licensee of
another state, the licensee shall use his or her state of licensure seal
and shall affix his or her signature and temporary permit to all his or
-2-

LB899 LB899
2026 2026
her work.
Sec. 2. Section 81-3449, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-3449 The provisions of the Engineers and Architects Regulation
Act regulating the practice of architecture do not apply to the following
activities:
(1) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of a
detached single-family through four-family dwelling of less than five
thousand square feet of above grade finished space. Any detached or
attached sheds, storage buildings, and garages incidental to the dwelling
are not included in the tabulation of finished space. Such exemption may
be increased by rule and regulation of the board adopted pursuant to the
Negotiated Rulemaking Act but shall not exceed the Type V, column B,
limitations set forth by the allowable height and building areas table in
the state building code adopted in section 71-6403;
(2) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of a
one-story commercial or industrial building or structure of less than
five thousand square feet of above grade finished space which does not
exceed thirty feet in height unless such building or structure, or the
remodeling or repairing thereof, provides for the employment, housing, or
assembly of twenty or more persons. Any detached or attached sheds,
storage buildings, and garages incidental to the building or structure
are not included in the tabulation of finished space. Such exemption may
be increased by rule and regulation of the board adopted pursuant to the
Negotiated Rulemaking Act but shall not exceed the Type V, column B,
limitations set forth by the allowable height and building areas table in
the state building code adopted in section 71-6403;
(3) The construction, remodeling, alteration, or renovation of farm
buildings, including barns, silos, sheds, or housing for farm equipment
and machinery, livestock, poultry, or storage, if the structures are
designed to be occupied by no more than twenty persons. Such exemption
-3-

LB899 LB899
2026 2026
may be increased by rule and regulation of the board adopted pursuant to
the Negotiated Rulemaking Act but shall not exceed the Type V, column B,
limitations set forth by the allowable height and building areas table in
the state building code adopted in section 71-6403;
(4) Any public works project with contemplated expenditures for a
completed project that do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. The
board shall adjust the dollar amount in this subdivision every fifth
year. The first such adjustment after August 27, 2011, shall be effective
on July 1, 2014. The adjusted amount shall be equal to the then current
amount adjusted by the cumulative percentage change in the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers published by the Federal Bureau of Labor
Statistics for the five-year period preceding the adjustment date. The
amount shall be rounded to the next highest one-thousand-dollar amount;
(5) Any alteration, renovation, or remodeling of a building if the
alteration, renovation, or remodeling does not affect architectural or
engineering safety features of the building;
(6) The teaching, including research and service, of architectural
subjects in a college or university offering a degree in architecture
accredited by the National Architectural Accrediting Board;
(7) The preparation of submissions to architects, building
officials, or other regulating authorities by the manufacturer, supplier,
or installer of any materials, assemblies, components, or equipment that
describe or illustrate the use of such items, the preparation of any
details or shop drawings required of the contractor by the terms of the
construction documents, or the management of construction contracts by
persons customarily engaged in contracting work;
(8) The preparation of technical submissions or the administration
of construction contracts by employees of a person or organization
lawfully engaged in the practice of architecture if such employees are
acting under the direct supervision of an architect;
(9) A public service provider or an organization who employs a
-4-

LB899 LB899
2026 2026
licensee performing professional services for itself;
(10) A nonresident who holds the certification issued by the
National Council of Architectural Registration Boards offering to render
the professional services involved in the practice of architecture. The
nonresident shall not perform any of the professional services involved
in the practice of architecture until licensed as provided in the
Engineers and Architects Regulation Act. The nonresident shall notify the
board in writing that (a) he or she holds a National Council of
Architectural Registration Boards certificate and is not currently
licensed in Nebraska but will be present in Nebraska for the purpose of
offering to render architectural services, (b) he or she will deliver a
copy of the notice to every potential client to whom the applicant offers
to render architectural services, and (c) he or she promises to apply
immediately to the board for licensure if selected as the architect for
the project;
(10) (11) The practice by a qualified member of another legally
recognized profession who is otherwise licensed or certified by this
state or any political subdivision to perform services consistent with
the laws of this state, the training, and the code of ethics of the
respective profession, if such qualified member does not represent
himself or herself to be practicing architecture and does not represent
himself or herself to be an architect;
(11) (12) Financial institutions making disbursements of funds in
connection with construction projects;
(12) (13) Earthmoving and related work associated with soil and
water conservation practices performed on farmland or any land owned by a
political subdivision that is not subject to a permit from the Department
of Water, Energy, and Environment or for work related to livestock waste
facilities that are not subject to a permit by the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment; and
(13) (14) The work of employees and agents of a political
-5-

LB899 LB899
2026 2026
subdivision or a nonprofit entity organized for the purpose of furnishing
electrical service performing, in accordance with other requirements of
law, their customary duties in the administration and enforcement of
codes, permit programs, and land-use regulations and their customary
duties in utility and public works construction, operation, and
maintenance.
Sec. 3. Section 81-3451, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3451 (1) The following shall be considered as the minimum
evidence satisfactory to the board that an applicant is eligible for
enrollment as an engineer-intern:
(a)(i) Graduation from a program accredited by the Engineering
Accreditation Commission of ABET;
(ii) Graduation from a program accredited by the Canadian
Engineering Accreditation Board; or
(iii) Meeting the Education Standard of the National Council of
Examiners for Engineering and Surveying as determined by the council;
(b) Passage of an examination in the fundamentals of engineering as
accepted by the Board of Engineers and Architects;
(c) Submittal of an application accompanied by the fee established
by the board; and
(d) Demonstration of good reputation and good ethical character by
attestation of references. The names and complete addresses of references
acceptable to the board shall be included in the application for
enrollment.
(2)(a) The following shall be considered as the minimum evidence
satisfactory to the board that an applicant is eligible for admission to
the examination on the principles and practice of engineering that is
adopted by the board:
(i)(A) Graduation from a program accredited by the Engineering
Accreditation Commission of ABET;
-6-

LB899 LB899
2026 2026
(B) Graduation from a program accredited by the Canadian Engineering
Accreditation Board; or
(C) Meeting the Education Standard of the National Council of
Examiners for Engineering and Surveying as determined by the council;
(ii) Passage of an examination in the fundamentals of engineering as
accepted by the Board of Engineers and Architects;
(iii) Submittal of an application accompanied by the fee established
by the board; and
(iv) Demonstration of good reputation and good ethical character by
attestation of references. The names and complete addresses of references
acceptable to the board shall be included in the application.
(b) A candidate who fails the principles and practice of engineering
examination may apply for reexamination, which may be granted upon
payment of a fee established by the board. In the event of a second or
subsequent failure, the examinee may, at the discretion of the board, be
required to appear before the board with evidence of having acquired the
necessary additional knowledge to qualify before admission to the
examination.
(2) (3) The following shall be considered as the minimum evidence
satisfactory to the board that an applicant is eligible for licensure as
a professional engineer:
(a)(i) Graduation from a program accredited by the Engineering
Accreditation Commission of ABET;
(ii) Graduation from a program accredited by the Canadian
Engineering Accreditation Board; or
(iii) Meeting the Education Standard of the National Council of
Examiners for Engineering and Surveying as determined by the council;
(b) Passage of an examination in the fundamentals of engineering
that is accepted by the Board of Engineers and Architects;
(c) (a) Passage of an examination in the principles and practice of
engineering that is accepted by the board examination as set forth in
-7-

LB899 LB899
2026 2026
subsection (2) of this section;
(d) (b) A record of four years or more of progressive post-
accredited-degree experience on engineering projects of a grade and
character which indicates to the board that the applicant may be
competent to practice engineering;
(e) Submittal of an application for licensure as a professional
engineer accompanied by a fee established by the board;
(f) (c) Demonstration of good reputation and good ethical character
by attestation of references. The names and complete addresses of
references acceptable to the board shall be included in the application
for licensure; and
(g) (d) Successful passage of an examination on the statutes, rules,
and other requirements unique to this state.
(3) (4) An individual holding a license to practice engineering
issued by a proper authority of any jurisdiction, based on credentials
that do not conflict with subsection subsections (2) and (3) of this
section and other provisions of the Engineers and Architects Regulation
Act, may, upon application, be licensed as a professional engineer after:
(a) Demonstration of good reputation and good ethical character by
attestation of references. The names and complete addresses of references
acceptable to the board shall be included in the application for
licensure; and
(b) Successful passage of an examination on the statutes, rules, and
other requirements unique to this state.
(4) (5) An individual who has been licensed to practice engineering
for fifteen years or more in one or more jurisdictions and who has
practiced engineering for fifteen years in compliance with the licensing
laws in the jurisdictions where his or her engineering practice has
occurred since initial licensure may, upon application, be licensed as a
professional engineer after:
(a) Demonstration of good reputation and good ethical character by
-8-

LB899 LB899
2026 2026
attestation of references. The names and complete addresses of references
acceptable to the board shall be included in the application for
licensure; and
(b) Successful passage of an examination on the statutes, rules, and
other requirements unique to this state.
(5) (6) The board may designate a professional engineer as being
licensed in a specific discipline or branch of engineering signifying the
area in which the professional engineer has demonstrated competence.
(6) (7) Upon application to the board in writing and payment of a
fee established by the board, an individual who holds a valid license to
practice engineering in another jurisdiction may be issued a temporary
permit, valid for a definite period of time, to provide engineering
services for a specific project. An individual may not be issued more
than one temporary permit. No right to practice engineering accrues to
such applicant with respect to any other work not set forth in the
temporary permit. Temporary permit holders are subject to all of the
provisions of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act governing the
practice of engineering.
(7) (8) None of the examination materials described in this section
shall be considered public records.
(8) (9) The board or its agent shall direct the time and place of
the engineering examinations referenced in subsections (1) and , (2) ,
and (3) of this section.
(9) (10) The board may adopt the examinations and grading procedures
of the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying. The
board may also adopt guidelines published by the council.
(10) (11) Licensure shall be effective upon issuance.
Sec. 4. Original sections 81-3437.01 and 81-3451, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 81-3449, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
-9-